Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1007
Board; purpose.

The purpose of the State Anatomical Board is to:

(1) Provide for the orderly receipt, maintenance, distribution, and use of human bodies used for medical education and research;

(2) Ensure that proper and considerate care is given to human bodies used for medical education and research; and

(3) Ensure that an orderly and equitable procedure is used for the allocation of human bodies to colleges and universities in Nebraska which provide medical education and research.

Laws 1979, LB 98, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB559, § 4.